Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.070

Removal of appointive officers.

The governor may remove from office any state officer appointed by him or her not liable to impeachment, for incompetency, misconduct, or malfeasance in office.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5017; 1965 c 8 s 43.06.070. Prior: 1893 c 101 s 1; RRS s 10988.]